Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF419.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 2762XS (3) 91 da/ns S.F. 419 Section 1. Section 459.102, subsection 15, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 15. âConfinement feeding operationâ means an animal feeding 3 operation in which animals are confined to areas which are 4 totally or partially roofed. 5 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 459.104 Moratorium ââ confinement 6 feeding operation structures. 7 1. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or any 8 other provision of law to the contrary, a person shall not 9 construct, including expand, a confinement feeding operation 10 structure. 11 2. Subsection 1 does not apply to a confinement feeding 12 operation structure that is part of a small animal feeding 13 operation. 14 3. This section does not prohibit a person from completing 15 construction, including expansion, of a confinement feeding 16 operation structure if, prior to the effective date of this 17 Act, the person has begun construction, including expansion, 18 of the confinement feeding operation structure as otherwise 19 allowed under this chapter. 20 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 21 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 22